Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1692.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302.1(a)(1) and (c)(1) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 302.1. Relief from Charges.--Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act assigning charges for compensation 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 paid to employes, except for section 302(a)(2), the department shall relieve an employer of charges for compensation in accordance with this section and section 213 of this act.(a) Circumstances allowing relief:(1) If an individual was separated from his most recent work for an employer due to being discharged for willful misconduct connected with that work, or due to his leaving that work without good cause attributable to his employment, or due to his being separated from such work under conditions which would result in disqualification for benefits under the provisions of section 3 or 402(e.1) and (e.2) of this act, the employer shall be relieved of charges for compensation paid to the individual with respect to any week of unemployment occurring subsequent to such separation. Relief from charges under this paragraph terminates if the employe returns to work for the employer.* * *(c) Relief from charges without a request:(1) If a claimant is determined ineligible for benefits under section 3 or 402(b), (e) [or], (e.1) or (e.2) of this act pursuant to a notice of determination that has become final, the department shall grant relief from charges in accordance with subsection (a)(1) to the employer from whom the claimant was separated, beginning with the earliest week for which the claimant is eligible for benefits following the week or weeks governed by the notice of determination.* * *Section 2. Section 402(b) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 402. Ineligibility for Compensation.--An employe shall be ineligible for compensation for any week--20250HB1692PN2077 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(b) In which his unemployment is due to voluntarily leaving work without cause of a necessitous and compelling nature attributable to his employment, irrespective of whether or not such work is in "employment" as defined in this act: Provided, That a voluntary leaving work because of a work-related disability if the employer is able to provide other suitable work, shall be deemed not a cause of a necessitous and compelling nature: attributable to his employment: And provided further, That no employe shall be deemed to be ineligible under this subsection where the Federal Unemployment Tax Act requires eligibility: And provided further, That no employe shall be deemed to be ineligible under this subsection where as a condition of continuing in employment such employe would be required to join or remain a member of a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization, or to accept wages, hours or conditions of employment not desired by a majority of the employes in the establishment or the occupation, or would be denied the right of collective bargaining under generally prevailing conditions, and that in determining whether or not an employe has left his work voluntarily without cause of a necessitous and compelling nature attributable to his employment, the department shall give consideration to the same factors, insofar as they are applicable, provided, with respect to the determination of suitable work under section four (t): And provided further, That the provisions of this subsection shall not apply in the event of a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute within the meaning of subsection (d). Provided further, That no otherwise eligible claimant shall be denied benefits for any 20250HB1692PN2077 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 week in which his unemployment is due to exercising the option of accepting a layoff, from an available position pursuant to a labor-management contract agreement, or pursuant to an established employer plan, program or policy: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for voluntarily leaving work, which is not suitable employment to enter training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for voluntarily leaving work if the claimant left such work to accompany a spouse who is on active duty with the United States Armed Forces and is required to relocate due to permanent change of station orders, activation orders or unit deployment orders and such relocation would make it impractical or unreasonably difficult, as determined by the department, for the claimant to continue employment with the claimant's employer. For purposes of this subsection the term "suitable employment" means with respect to a claimant, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the claimant's past "adversely affected employment" (as defined in section 247 of the Trade Act of 1974), and wages for such work at not less than eighty per centum of the worker's "average weekly wage" (as defined in section 247 of the Trade Act of 1974).* * *(e.2) In which his unemployment is due to discharge or temporary suspension from work for any of the following reasons:(1) Failure to obey any reasonable workplace rule or work-related government regulation or law of which the employe was aware.(2) The deliberate damage to property of the employer or another employe or the theft of an employer's or another 20250HB1692PN2077 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employe's property.(3) Reporting to work under the influence of alcohol or illegal drugs or consuming alcohol or using illegal drugs while at work.(4) Threatening a coworker or supervisor with physical harm or threatening to harm the interests of the employer.(5) Disregard of a supervisor's reasonable directives or orders or acts of negligence which indicate substantial disregard for the employer's interests.(6) Failure to maintain a valid license or certificate that has been issued by a Federal or Commonwealth agency or political subdivision and which is a requirement of employment, unless the failure was for reasons beyond the control of the employe.(7) Failure to provide good cause for being absent from work on two or more occasions or failure to report in a proper manner under the employer's policy for absences from work on two or more occasions.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 402.7. Eligibility Related to Domestic Violence.--(a) An employe shall not be deemed to be ineligible under section 402(b) for voluntarily leaving employment or section 402(e) or (e.2) for failure to attend work if, due to a domestic violence situation, the individual's continued employment would jeopardize the safety of the individual or a member of the individual's family or household.(b) Verification of a domestic violence situation may be provided on the initial application for benefits through any one of the following which documents recent domestic violence:(1) An active or recently issued protective order or other 20250HB1692PN2077 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 order, court records, a police record, medical treatment records, social services records or child protective services records.(2) A statement supporting the existence of recent domestic violence from a qualified professional from whom the individual has sought assistance, such as a counselor, shelter worker, member of the clergy, attorney or health care worker, or a similar statement from a friend or relative from whom the individual has sought assistance.(3) A self-affirmation that the individual's continued employment would jeopardize the safety of the individual or a member of the individual's family or household due to the domestic violence situation.(4) Any other type of evidence that reasonably proves domestic violence.(c) The documentation of domestic violence shall remain confidential and the department may not disclose the existence of a domestic violence situation in any notice provided to an employer regarding the claim for compensation.(d) (1) If an individual who submits verification under subsection (b) in a form acceptable to the department is otherwise eligible under section 401, the individual shall be considered eligible and the department shall expedite a determination of eligibility under section 501.(2) An individual who submits a self-affirmation under subsection (b)(3) shall submit documentation of the domestic violence situation under subsection (b)(1), (2) or (4) to the department within one hundred fifty (150) days of the date of application.(3) This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit 20250HB1692PN2077 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redetermination of eligibility within eighteen (18) months of the application for benefits if the department receives information within eighteen (18) months of the application for benefits indicating that the self-affirmation submitted under subsection (b)(3) included false information or an individual fails to submit documentation of the domestic violence situation under subsection (b)(1), (2) or (4) within one hundred fifty (150) days of the date of application.(e) The department shall grant relief from charges under section 302.1 to base year employers for benefit charges related to a claim that is determined eligible in accordance with this section. Relief from charges shall be provided without a request from the employer.(f) Subject to subsection (c), if an employer is granted relief from charges without a request under subsection (e), the department shall notify the employer that relief from charges shall be granted without the need for the employer to submit a request. Notice under this subsection may be included on the eligibility determination provided to the employer or on other relevant claim documentation delivered to the employer.Section 4. The Department of Labor and Industry shall consult with the Office of Victim Advocate and relevant advocacy groups when implementing section 402.7 of the act, including updates to the application for unemployment compensation, updated notices to claimants and employers and the development of any forms related to documentation of a domestic violence situation.Section 5. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1692PN2077 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728